Kentucky, session 2026RS, HB817.
Be it enacted by the General Assembly of the Commonwealth of Kentucky:
SECTION 1. A NEW SECTION OF KRS CHAPTER 500 IS CREATED TO
READ AS FOLLOWS:
A person shall not be penalized, prosecuted, or otherwise subjected to adverse action
based on that person's actual, potential, perceived, or alleged pregnancy outcomes,
including but not limited to miscarriage, stillbirth, or abortion.
Section 2. The following KRS section is repealed:
530.030 Concealing birth of infant.
Page 1 of 1
XXXX 3/2/2026 8:46 AM Jacketed